California, session 20252026, AB1338.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 118.10 is added to the Streets and Highways Code, to read:118.10. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Fernwood Avenue property” means the parcel owned by the City of Lynwood, located in the City of Lynwood between Fernwood Avenue and Imperial Highway, legally described and identified as Parcels 1 and 2 in the City of Lynwood Certificate of Compliance having Instrument Number 20250434105, and to be developed as affordable and market-rate housing.(2) “Imperial Highway property” means the parcel located in, and owned by, the City of Lynwood, legally described in the California Department of Transportation Director’s Deed having Instrument Number 20170260321, and formerly identified as the California Department of Transportation Parcel Number DD 058166-01-01.(b) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) In 2016, the department transferred the Imperial Highway property located at the corner of Imperial Highway and Fernwood Avenue in the City of Lynwood to the city.(2) The deed that conveyed the Imperial Highway property to the City of Lynwood contains a department deed restriction that requires the Imperial Highway property to be used exclusively for public purposes for a period of 15 years from the recorded date of the deed.(3) The City of Lynwood acquired the Imperial Highway property with the public purpose of developing much needed housing in the City of Lynwood. However, due to environmental conditions of the soil and the Imperial Highway property’s proximity to the Interstate 105 Freeway, it is ineligible for critical public funding, thus making the development of affordable and market-rate housing difficult.(4) Allowing the transfer of the deed restriction from the Imperial Highway property to the Fernwood Avenue property furthers the department’s public purpose goal of putting public property for public uses and furthers the important goal of the City of Lynwood and the state of developing affordable and market-rate housing to meet housing demand for residents of the City of Lynwood and the state.(c) The department shall, upon request from the City of Lynwood, develop and enter into an agreement with the city to release and remove the deed restriction imposed on the Imperial Highway property if all the following requirements are met:(1) The City of Lynwood agrees to transfer the deed restriction to the Fernwood Avenue property.(2) The Fernwood Avenue property is equal to or greater in size than the Imperial Highway property.(3) (A) The Fernwood Avenue property is appraised at a value equal to, or greater than, the appraised value of the Imperial Highway property on a per-acre basis.(B) For purposes of this paragraph, the appraised value of the Imperial Highway property shall be based on the appraised value of the parcel at the time of its acquisition from the department, and the appraised value of the Fernwood Avenue property shall be based on the appraised value of the parcel at the time of the transfer of the deed restriction.(4) The deed restriction to be applied to the Fernwood Avenue property is 45 years, beginning on the date that the deed restriction is recorded.(d) (1) If the City of Lynwood enters into an agreement with the department pursuant to subdivision (c), the City of Lynwood shall submit a report to the Legislature, including the Assembly and Senate Committees on Transportation, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on the use of this section to develop the Imperial Highway property and the Fernwood Avenue property. (2) A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted within one year of the City of Lynwood and the department entering into the agreement and annually thereafter until the planned development projects are completed.(3) Each report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(A) Plans for the development of the properties, including types of development.(B) The status of any pending projects on the properties.(C) The number of affordable housing units, affordability level, and size of units.(D) Any public financing or grants that were used to build the developments.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique nature of the Imperial Highway property located in the City of Lynwood in the County of Los Angeles and the state’s goal and commitment to affordable and market-rate housing.SECTION 1.Section 41514.6 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:41514.6.(a)On or before January 1, 2027, a district the jurisdiction of which includes metal shredding facilities, in consultation with the Department of Toxic Substances Control and the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, shall develop requirements for facilitywide fence-line air quality monitoring at metal shredding facilities, as defined in Section 25150.82, that are subject to Section 25150.84 and this section.(b)The requirements developed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(1)Development of threshold levels, in consultation with the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, for airborne contaminants, including, but not limited to, lead, zinc, cadmium, and nickel, at the fence lines of metal shredding facilities that are protective of air quality and public health. The threshold levels shall follow health guidance values adopted by the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, if available.(2)Development of threshold levels for community notification of potential adverse impact on public health based on the threshold values developed pursuant to paragraph (1).(3)Development of actions, in consultation with the Department of Toxic Substances Control, to be taken by metal shredding facilities if threshold levels developed pursuant to paragraph (1) are exceeded, and a method of enforcing those actions.(4)Development of community notification procedures to inform the public in areas in which the metal shredding facility is located, if the monitoring required pursuant to this subdivision indicates the threshold levels developed pursuant to paragraph (2) were exceeded.(5)Reporting the results of the monitoring required pursuant to this subdivision to the district and the local public health department.(c)All metal shredding facilities subject to this section shall implement the facilitywide fence-line air quality monitoring developed pursuant to this section.(d)On or before July 1, 2027, a district the jurisdiction of which includes metal shredding facilities shall adopt regulations to implement, interpret, or make specific the requirements pursuant to this section.(e)A district the jurisdiction of which includes metal shredding facilities shall oversee and enforce the compliance of metal shredding facilities with regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (d).(f)Any reasonable regulatory costs incurred by a district in implementing this section shall be reimbursed by the owner or operator of a metal shredding facility.(g)The Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment’s costs to implement this section shall be reimbursed from the subaccount established in the Hazardous Waste Control Account pursuant to Section 25150.84.